Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-603
District; organization; amendment of charter; petition.

A district may be organized and may amend its charter under Chapter 70, article 6, by filing in the office of the Nebraska Power Review Board a petition in compliance with requirements set forth in Chapter 70, article 6, and receiving the approval of the petition by the Nebraska Power Review Board.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 3, p. 339;

Laws 1937, c. 152, § 3, p. 579;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-703;

Laws 1943, c. 145, § 1(1), p. 507;

R.S.1943, § 70-603;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 949, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB53, § 1.

Initial step toward the organization of a district is the filing of a petition. Schroll v. City of Beatrice, 169 Neb. 162, 98 N.W.2d 790 (1959).